Sidath/files/f1.foma
### Sinhala.foma ###

# Vowels
define A [ක | ​ඛ | ග | ​ඝ | ච | ​ඡ | ජ | ට | ඨ | ඩ | ඪ | ණ | ත | ද | ධ | න | ප | ඵ | බ | භ | ම | ය | ර | ල | ව | ශ | ෂ | ස | හ | ළ | ​ෆ | ඟ | ඬ | ඳ | ඹ];

define B [ ු ණ ු | ු න ෙ ම ි | ු න ෙ ම ු | ු න ෙ හ ි | ු න ෙ හ ු | ු න ේ ය | ු න ා ය | ු න ෝ ය | ි ය න ් | ි ය ල ් ල ා];

define C [ව | ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ෙ හ ු | ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්];

define D [ේ | ෙ ම ි | ෙ ම ු | ෙ හ ි | ෙ හ ු | ෙ ය ි | ෙ ත ි | ව ෙ ය ි | ව ෙ ත ි | ව ේ | ි ය | ු න ො ත ් | ු න ේ];

define E [ි ද];


read lexc f1.lexc
define Lexicon;

######### Rewrite rules

###
define UpadiAClass          ි -> 0 || A _ "^" [B | C | D | E] ;
define UpadiBClass          උ -> ඉ || .#. _ ?* "^" [B | D | E] ;
define UpadiCClass          ද -> 0 || A _ "^" E ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassE1Grammar 	Lexicon                 .o.
                        UpadiAClass             .o.
                        UpadiBClass             .o.
                        UpadiCClass             .o.
               	        Cleanup;

regex ClassE1Grammar;
